Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 3 ORGANIZATION - OPERATION
2-2-320. Legislative department contracts - approval.

Any contract to which the house of representatives or the senate is a party shall be approved by the speaker of the house of representatives or the president of the senate, as the case may be. Whenever the house of representatives and the senate are parties to the same contract, both the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate shall approve the contract. Any contract to which the legislative council, the office of legislative legal services, the joint budget committee, the office of the state auditor, or the commission on uniform state laws is a party shall be approved by the chair or vice-chair of the governing committee of such agency, as the case may be.

For legislative department contracts subject to section 29 of article V of the state constitution, the attorney general shall approve all such legislative department contracts as to form, and the controller shall approve such contracts in accordance with section 24-30-202, C.R.S.

The director of the office of legislative legal services or the director's designee shall approve all legislative department contracts not subject to section 29 of article V of the state constitution. No approval by the controller or any assistant designated by the controller shall be required for the validity of any contract entered into and approved under this paragraph (b). The controller shall issue payment for expenditures for legislative department contracts approved in accordance with this paragraph (b) as set forth in section 24-30-202, C.R.S. Notwithstanding the legislative department's exemption from the fiscal rules pursuant to section 24-2-101, C.R.S., the office of legislative legal services shall consider the fiscal rules as guidelines for legislative department contracts approved under this paragraph (b) and may consult with the controller or attorney general, or both, when drafting legislative department contracts.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 672, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 63-2-32.

L. 81:

(2) amended, p. 1289, § 9, effective January 1, 1982.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 374, § 1, effective April 21.

L. 87:

(2) amended, p. 347, § 1, effective July 1; (2) amended, p. 982, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(1) amended, p. 310, § 17, effective May 23.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1623, § 8, effective May 31.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1020), ch. 111, p. 369, § 1, effective April 15.

2-2-321. Designation and assignment of space in capitol buildings group and on the grounds thereof.

The general assembly, by joint resolution, shall designate and assign such space in the capitol building (except for space on the first floor, which shall be designated and assigned by the executive department for the use of elected officials) and on the grounds surrounding the capitol which is necessary for the use of the legislative department, including, but not limited to, parking space on the grounds and streets surrounding the capitol building, all areas of the subbasement of the capitol building, and access to all tunnels providing access to the subbasements of the capitol building, the legislative services building, and the state office building at 1525 Sherman street.

Notwithstanding any law, rule, or provision of any tenant handbook for the capitol complex facilities to the contrary, the executive committee of the legislative council created in section 2-3-301 (1) may grant any member or employee of the general assembly access to any or all of the tunnels providing access to the subbasements of the capitol building, the legislative services building, and the state office building at 1525 Sherman street unless, after consultation with the department of personnel and the Colorado state patrol, the executive committee determines that denial of access is necessary to address immediate concerns about building security and occupant protection.

Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, after the attorney general and the staff of the attorney general vacate the state office building at 1525 Sherman street, the department of personnel shall designate parking space in the state parking lot at Lincoln street and east Colfax avenue to the general assembly based upon approximately the same proportion as the proportion of space in the state office building at 1525 Sherman street designated and assigned by the general assembly to the total amount of space in that state office building. The general assembly, by joint resolution, shall assign parking space allocated to the general assembly pursuant to this paragraph (c).

In addition, the general assembly shall designate and assign such space in the legislative services building at Fourteenth avenue and Sherman street, including, but not limited to, all areas of the subbasement of the legislative services building, and on no more than two floors of the state office building at 1525 Sherman street after the attorney general and the staff of the attorney general vacate said state office building and may provide for the furnishing and equipping thereof as may be necessary for the use of the legislative department.

If any of the space referred to in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) is assigned to the senate or house of representatives, the executive committee of the legislative council created in section 2-3-301 (1) shall determine the allocation of the space between the two houses.

Any space allocated to the senate shall be assigned by the president of the senate and the majority and minority leaders of the senate in an equitable manner among the major political parties with which members of the senate are affiliated.

Any space allocated to the house of representatives shall be assigned by the speaker of the house of representatives and the majority and minority leaders of the house of representatives in an equitable manner among the major political parties with which members of the house of representatives are affiliated.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire section added, p. 292, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 254, § 1, effective May 20.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1348), ch. 163, p. 571, § 1, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For security for the capitol buildings group, see § 24-82-105.

2-2-322. Fiscal notes - repeal.

The general assembly shall provide by rule for legislative service agency review of the fiscal impact of legislative measures.

(1.5) (a) Commencing with the second regular session of the seventy-second general assembly, the fiscal note for a legislative measure required under subsection (1) of this section must indicate if a greenhouse gas emissions report has been prepared pursuant to section 2-3-322.3.

This subsection (1.5) is repealed, effective September 1, 2025.

The general assembly shall provide by rule, as recommended by the executive committee of legislative council, for legislative service agency review of the fiscal impact of legislative measures which include the creation or increase of any fee collected by a state agency. The fiscal information on such measures shall include the average amount of such fee collected annually by such agency from each individual, family, or business, whichever is applicable, paying such fee and a projection of the average amount of such fee that will be collected from each individual, family, or business subsequent to the creation of or increase in such fee.

(2.5) If a legislative measure creates a new criminal offense, increases or decreases the crime classification of an existing criminal offense, or changes an element of an existing offense that creates a new factual basis for the offense, the fiscal note shall include the following:

A description of the elements of the proposed new crime or a description of the new, amended, or additional elements of an existing crime;

An analysis of whether the new crime, or changes to an existing crime, may be charged under current Colorado law;

A comparison of the proposed crime classification to similar types of offenses;

An analysis of the current and anticipated future prevalence of the behavior that the proposed new crime, or changes to an existing crime, intends to address; and

A description of gender and minority data as it relates to the general Colorado population and available data on gender and minority offender and crime victims populations potentially affected by the proposed measure.

Each state department, agency, or institution shall cooperate with and provide information on the fiscal impact of a legislative measure in the manner requested by the staff of the legislative council for consideration by the staff in connection with the preparation of a fiscal note for the measure.

The state department, agency, or institution shall substantiate the calculation of the fiscal impact of the legislative measure in its response to a request for information made pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) by providing any documentation that clearly identifies any assumptions supporting that calculation and a narrative discussion of the justification for any increase or decrease in workload.

The state department, agency, or institution shall meet the deadlines established by the staff of the legislative council for providing a response to a request for information made pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) or shall specify the need for additional time to provide the response. If additional time is required to respond to the request for information, the staff of the legislative council shall set a reasonable time for providing the information.

The state department, agency, or institution shall not modify the amount of the fiscal impact that was originally calculated for a legislative measure after the staff of the legislative council has released and made public the fiscal note for such measure unless:

The measure has been amended;

There is newly discovered information that was previously unavailable that warrants modification of the original calculation and narrative submitted by the state department, agency, or institution; or

Technical errors are discovered that warrant modification of the original calculation and narrative submitted by the state department, agency, or institution.

Information supporting a modification to the fiscal impact shall be submitted in the manner requested by the staff of the legislative council by the head of the state department, agency, or institution.

In addition to any other requirement under this section or in the legislative rules for legislative service agency review of the fiscal impact of legislative measures, the general assembly shall also provide for legislative service agency review of the fiscal impact of legislative measures considered by committees of the general assembly meeting during the legislative interim. For each interim, the deadlines and guidelines adopted prior to each interim by the executive committee of the legislative council for requesting and finalizing interim committee bills must allow for sufficient time between the public release of the fiscal note for a particular measure by the staff of the legislative council and the final vote by the applicable legislative interim committee so that members of the committee are able to consider the fiscal note in voting on the measure. For each interim, the specific dates by which these requirements will be satisfied must be specified in the applicable set of deadlines and guidelines for that interim. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (4), all other requirements governing legislative service agency review of the fiscal impact of legislative measures considered during regular legislative sessions that are specified in this section or in the legislative rules also govern the requirements of this subsection (4).

In preparing a fiscal note for any legislative proposal that may impose a new health benefit coverage mandate on health benefit plans or mandate a reduction or elimination of coverage under a health benefit plan and for which a report has been prepared by a contractor pursuant to section 10-16-155, the legislative service agency charged with preparing the fiscal note shall include a statement that a report has been prepared by the contractors for the legislative proposal pursuant to section 10-16-155 and submitted to the director of research of the legislative council by the division, including an indication of how the contractors' final report may be obtained in its entirety.

This subsection (5) is repealed, effective November 1, 2027.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 305, § 2, effective May 23.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1405, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(3) added, (HB 09-1112), ch. 40, p. 155, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(2.5) added, (HB 11-1239), ch. 74, p. 204, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2013:

(2.5)(c) and (2.5)(d) amended and (2.5)(e) added, (SB 13-229), ch. 272, p. 1426, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(4) added, (HB 15-1335), ch. 276, p. 1130, § 2, effective June 4.

L. 2019:

(1.5) added, (HB 19-1188), ch. 339, p. 3104, § 3, effective May 29.

L. 2022:

(5) added, (SB 22-040), ch. 449, p. 3166, § 2, effective August 10.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration in HB 15-1335, see section 1 of chapter 276, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1188, see section 1 of chapter 339, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

2-2-322.3. Greenhouse gas emissions reports - definitions - repeal.

For purposes of this section, unless the context requires otherwise:

"Greenhouse gas" means:

Carbon dioxide;

Methane;

Nitrous oxide;

Hydrofluorocarbons;

Perfluorocarbons; or

Sulfur hexafluoride.

"Greenhouse gas emissions report" or "report" means a note that uses available data to assess whether a legislative measure is likely to directly cause a net increase or decrease in greenhouse gas pollution within the ten-year period following its enactment, including identifying new sources of greenhouse gas emissions, any increase or decrease in emissions from existing sources, and any impact on sequestration of emissions. A report is not required to quantify the magnitude of the impact on emissions, but may do so to the extent that nonpartisan staff is able to provide an unbiased estimate given the available data.

Commencing with the second regular session of the seventy-second general assembly and during each regular session thereafter, the staff of the legislative council shall prepare greenhouse gas emissions reports on legislative bills as specified in subsection (2)(b) of this section.

The speaker of the house of representatives, the minority leader of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the minority leader of the senate may each request the preparation of a greenhouse gas emissions report on up to five legislative bills, or more at the discretion of the director of research of the legislative council.

Prior to commencing work on a report, the staff of the legislative council shall meet with the member of leadership requesting the report and with the sponsor of the legislative bill to discuss whether a greenhouse gas emissions report can practically be completed for that legislative bill. If not, the member of leadership may request a report, within the limits specified in subsection (2)(b) of this section, on a different legislative bill that might be more conducive to a greenhouse gas emissions report's analysis.

No later than December 1, 2019, the director of research of the legislative council shall develop the procedures for requesting, completing, and updating the greenhouse gas emissions reports and shall memorialize the procedures in a letter to the executive committee of the legislative council. The department of natural resources, the Colorado energy office, and any other state department, agency, or institution with subject matter expertise shall cooperate with and provide information to the director to assist in developing the policies and procedures required by this subsection (2)(d) if requested by the director.

Each state department, agency, or institution shall cooperate with and provide information for a greenhouse gas emissions report on a legislative bill in the manner requested by the staff of the legislative council.

The state department, agency, or institution shall meet the deadlines established by the staff of the legislative council for providing a response to a request for information made pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section or shall specify the need for additional time to provide the response. If additional time is required to respond to the request for information, the staff of the legislative council shall set a reasonable time for providing the information.

On or before December 1, 2024, the director of research of the legislative council shall provide a report to the legislative council on the implementation of this section, including information about the number of greenhouse gas emissions reports prepared, the types of analysis and information the reports provided, and any changes or developments in the policies and procedures for creating greenhouse gas emissions reports over time.

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2025.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1188), ch. 339, p. 3102, § 2, effective May 29.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1188, see section 1 of chapter 339, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

2-2-322.5. Demographic notes - definitions.

For purposes of this section:

"Demographic note" means a note that uses available data to outline the potential effects of a legislative measure on disparities within the state, including a statement of whether the measure is likely to increase or decrease disparities to the extent the data is available.

"Disparities" means the difference in economic, employment, health, education, or public safety outcomes between the state population as a whole and subgroups of the population defined by socioeconomic status, race, ethnicity, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, disability, geography, or any other relevant characteristic for which data are available.

Commencing with the second regular session of the seventy-second general assembly and during each regular session thereafter, the staff of the legislative council shall prepare demographic notes on legislative bills as specified in subsection (2)(b) of this section.

The speaker of the house of representatives, the minority leader of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the minority leader of the senate may each request the preparation of a demographic note on up to five legislative bills, or more at the discretion of the director of research of the legislative council.

Prior to commencing work on a demographic note, the staff of the legislative council shall meet with the member of leadership requesting the demographic note and with the sponsor of the legislative bill to discuss whether a demographic note can practically be completed for that legislative bill. If not, the member of leadership may request a demographic note, within the limits specified in subsection (2)(b) of this section, on a different legislative bill that might be more conducive to a demographic note's analysis.

No later than December 1, 2019, the director of research of the legislative council shall develop the procedures for requesting, completing, and updating the demographic notes and such procedures must be memorialized in a letter to the executive committee of the legislative council.

Each state department, agency, or institution shall cooperate with and provide information for a demographic note on a legislative bill in the manner requested by the staff of the legislative council.

The state department, agency, or institution shall meet the deadlines established by the staff of the legislative council for providing a response to a request for information made pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section or shall specify the need for additional time to provide the response. If additional time is required to respond to the request for information, the staff of the legislative council shall set a reasonable time for providing the information.

The director of research may seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purpose of paying for training on demographic notes for the staff of the legislative council.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1184), ch. 261, p. 2476, § 1, effective August 2.

2-2-323. Service of process on the general assembly - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that the provisions of the Colorado rules of civil procedure which govern the service of process on the state, on officers, agents, or employees of the state, and on departments and agencies of the state do not expressly address service on the general assembly; that such rules require delivery of a copy of any process to the attorney general, even though by statute the attorney general does not represent the general assembly; that confusion has existed about how the general assembly should be served; and that clarification of the procedure for serving the general assembly would be beneficial for all parties who may become involved in future litigation.

Service of process on the general assembly as an entity shall be upon the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate. The provisions of the Colorado rules of civil procedure concerning service of process, including the contents of the summons, by whom process may be served, and the manner of proof of service, shall continue to apply to service of process on the general assembly.

As quickly as possible after service of process on the general assembly, the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall notify the speaker of the house and the minority leader of the house, and the secretary of the senate shall notify the president of the senate and the minority leader of the senate, concerning such service.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 26, § 1, effective March 9.

2-2-324. Committees of reference - program review. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1154, § 2, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 2003:

Entire section repealed, p. 1981, § 2, effective May 22.

2-2-325. Legislative appointees - boards and commissions - other governmental bodies.

Unless otherwise provided by law, appointments or reappointments of persons to a board, commission, committee, council, panel, or authority by the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, the majority leader of the house of representatives, the majority leader of the senate, the minority leader of the house of representatives, or the minority leader of the senate shall expire on the convening date of the first regular session of each general assembly, and all subsequent appointments or reappointments shall be made as soon as practicable after such convening date. The person making the original appointment or reappointment shall fill any vacancy by appointment for the remainder of an unexpired term. Members appointed or reappointed by the speaker, the president, the majority leader of the house of representatives, the majority leader of the senate, the minority leader of the house of representatives, or the minority leader of the senate shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority and shall continue in office until the member's successor is appointed.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 174, § 1, effective March 22.

2-2-326. Compensation and expenses for members appointed to and serving on state entities - definition.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary:

While appointed to any state entity and serving on any state entity during regular and special sessions of the general assembly, in addition to the base compensation specified in section 2-2-307 (1), current members of the general assembly are entitled to receive only the per diem lodging and expense allowances and the travel expenses authorized by section 2-2-317; and

While appointed to and serving on any state entity when the general assembly is in recess for more than three days or is not in session, in addition to the base compensation specified in section 2-2-307 (1), current members of the general assembly are entitled to receive the amount specified in section 2-2-307 (3)(a) for necessary attendance at meetings of the state entity and reimbursement for all actual and necessary travel and subsistence expenses incurred in connection with attendance at meetings of the state entity. Mileage rates shall not exceed those authorized for the executive department. All compensation paid and reimbursements made pursuant to this paragraph (b) shall be paid from appropriations made to the legislative department.

For purposes of this section, "state entity" means any board, commission, committee, task force, authority, enterprise, council, working group, review team, or other entity created or authorized by statute on which current members of the general assembly are statutorily required to be appointed to serve; except that "state entity" does not include the Colorado commission on uniform state laws created in section 2-3-601 (1) or the education commission of the states created pursuant to section 24-60-1201, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (SB 14-153), ch. 390, p. 1959, § 1, effective June 6.

2-2-327. Annual address to joint session by tribal governments.

Each year, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall invite the Ute Mountain Ute Tribe, through a representative designated by the Ute Mountain Ute Tribe tribal council, and the Southern Ute Indian Tribe, through a representative designated by the Southern Ute Indian Tribe tribal council, to give an address to a joint session of the general assembly. The president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the representatives designated by the Ute Mountain Ute Tribe and Southern Ute Indian Tribe shall jointly determine the date and time of the address on an annual basis.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-105), ch. 82, p. 401, § 1, effective August 10.